California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(ii) Each region of the department shall log the notifications of activities where no agreement is required. The log shall list the date the notification was received by the department, a brief description of the proposed
 activity, and the location of the activity. Each item shall remain on the log for one year. Upon written request by any person, a regional office shall send the log to that person monthly for one year. A request made pursuant to this clause may be renewed annually.

(B) The department determines that the activity may substantially adversely affect an existing fish or wildlife resource and issues a final agreement to the entity that includes reasonable measures necessary to protect the resource, and the entity conducts the activity in accordance with the agreement.

(C) A panel of arbitrators issues a final agreement to the entity in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 1603, and the entity conducts the activity in accordance with the agreement.

(D) The department does not issue a draft agreement to the entity
 within 60 days from the date notification is complete, and the entity conducts the activity as described in the notification, including any measures in the notification that are intended to protect fish and wildlife resources.

(b) (1) If an activity involves the routine maintenance and operation of water supply, drainage, flood control, or waste treatment and disposal facilities, notice to and agreement with the department shall not be required after the initial notification and agreement, unless the department determines either of the following:

(A) The work described in the agreement has substantially changed.

(B) Conditions affecting fish and wildlife resources have substantially changed, and those resources are adversely affected by the activity conducted under the agreement.

(2) This subdivision applies only if notice to, and agreement with, the department was attained prior to January 1, 1977, and the department has been provided a copy of the agreement or other proof of the existence of the agreement that satisfies the department, if requested.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department is not required to determine whether the notification is complete or otherwise process the notification until the department has received the applicable fees.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an entity shall not be required to obtain an agreement with the department pursuant to this chapter for activities authorized by a license or renewed license for cannabis cultivation issued by the Department of Cannabis Control for the term of the license or renewed license if all of the following occur:

(A) The entity submits all of the following to the department:

(i) The written notification described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(ii) A copy of the license or renewed license for cannabis cultivation issued by the Department of Cannabis Control that includes the requirements specified in Section 26060.1 of the Business and Professions Code.

(iii) The fee specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(B) The department determines in its sole discretion that compliance with the requirements specified in Section 26060.1 of the Business and Professions Code that are included in the license will adequately protect existing fish and wildlife resources that may be substantially adversely affected by the cultivation without the need for additional measures that the department would include in a draft streambed alteration agreement in accordance with Section 1603.

(C) The department notifies the entity in writing that the exemption applies to the cultivation authorized by the license or renewed license.

(2) The department shall notify the entity in writing whether the exemption in paragraph (1) applies to the cultivation authorized by the license or renewed license within 60 days from the date that the notification is complete and the fee has been paid.

(3) If an entity receives an exemption pursuant to this subdivision and fails to comply with any of the requirements described in Section 26060.1 of the Business and Professions Code that are included in the license, the failure shall constitute a violation under this section, and the department shall notify the Department of Cannabis Control of any enforcement action taken.

(e) It is unlawful for any entity to violate this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 98.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1603.

(a) After the notification is complete, the department shall determine whether the activity may substantially adversely affect an existing fish and wildlife resource. If the department determines that the activity may have that effect, the department shall provide a draft agreement to the entity within 60 days after the notification is complete. The draft agreement shall describe the fish and wildlife resources that the department has determined the activity may substantially adversely affect and include measures to protect those resources. The department’s description of the affected resources shall be specific and detailed, and the department shall make available, upon request, the information upon which its determination of substantial adverse effect is based. Within 30 days of the date of receipt of the draft agreement, the entity shall notify the department whether the measures to protect fish and wildlife resources in that draft agreement are acceptable. If the department’s measures are not acceptable, the entity shall so notify the department in writing and specify the measures that are not acceptable. Upon written request, the department shall meet with the entity within 14 days of the date the department receives the request for the purpose of resolving any disagreement regarding those measures. If the entity fails to respond, in writing, within 90 days of receiving the draft agreement, the department may withdraw that agreement, and require the entity to resubmit a notification to the department before commencing the activity.

(b) If mutual agreement is not reached at any meeting held pursuant to subdivision (a), the entity may request, in writing, the appointment of a panel of arbitrators to resolve the disagreement. A panel of arbitrators shall be appointed within 14 days of receipt of the written request. The panel of arbitrators shall be comprised of three persons, as follows: one representative selected by the department; one representative selected by the affected entity; and a third person mutually agreed upon by the department and the entity, who shall serve as the panel chair. If the department and the entity cannot agree on the third person within that 14-day period, the third person shall be appointed in the manner provided by Section 1281.6 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The third person shall have scientific expertise relevant to the fish and wildlife resources that may be substantially adversely affected by the activity proposed by the entity and to the measures proposed by the department to protect those resources. The authority of the panel of arbitrators is limited to resolving disagreements regarding the measures specified in subdivision (a), and subdivisions (b) and (g) of Section 1605, and, in the case of an extension, whether or not the agreement needs to be modified to protect fish and wildlife resources. Any decision by the panel of arbitrators shall be issued within 14 days from the date the panel was established, shall be binding on the department and the affected entity, shall be based on the best scientific information reasonably available at the time of the arbitration, and, except for a decision to extend an agreement without modification, shall be made in the form of a final agreement. The final agreement issued by the panel shall also include, without modification, all measures that were not subject to arbitration. Each party shall pay the expenses of their selected representative and pay one-half the expenses of the third person.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 736, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1604.

Any party affected by a decision made by an arbitration panel pursuant to this chapter may petition a court of competent jurisdiction for confirmation, correction, or vacation of the decision in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1285) of Title 9 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 736, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1605.

(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the term of an agreement shall not exceed five years.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), after the agreement expires, the entity shall remain responsible for implementing any mitigation or other measures specified in the agreement to protect fish and wildlife resources.

(b) Any entity may request one extension of a previously-approved agreement, if the entity requests the extension prior to the expiration of its original term. The department shall grant the extension unless it determines that the agreement requires modification because the measures contained in the agreement no longer
 protect the fish and wildlife resources that the activity may substantially adversely affect. In the event the department makes that determination, the department shall propose measures intended to protect those resources.

(c) If the entity disagrees with the department’s determination that the agreement requires modification to protect fish and wildlife resources or with the measures proposed by the department, the disagreement shall be resolved pursuant to the procedures described in subdivision (b) of Section 1603.

(d) The department may not extend an agreement for more than five years.

(e) (1) An original agreement shall remain in effect until the department grants the extension request, or new measures are imposed to protect fish and wildlife resources by agreement or through the
 arbitration process.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an original agreement may not remain in effect for more than one year after its expiration date.

(f) If the entity fails to submit a request to extend an agreement prior to its expiration, the entity shall submit a new notification before commencing or continuing the activity covered by the agreement.

(g) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the department may issue an agreement, that otherwise meets the requirements of this chapter, for a term longer than five years if the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The information the entity provides to the department in its notification meets the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1602.

(2) The entity agrees to provide a status report to the department every four years. The status report shall be delivered to the department no later than 90 days prior to the end of each four-year period, and shall include all of the following information:

(A) A copy of the original agreement.

(B) The status of the activity covered by the agreement.

(C) An evaluation of the success or failure of the measures in the agreement to protect the fish and wildlife resources that the activity may substantially adversely affect.

(D) A discussion of any factors that could increase the predicted adverse impacts on fish and wildlife resources, and a description of the resources that may be adversely
 affected.

(3) The department shall review the four-year status report, and conduct an onsite inspection to confirm that the entity is in compliance with the agreement and that the measures in the agreement continue to protect the fish and wildlife resources. If the department determines that the measures in the agreement no longer protect the fish and wildlife resources that are being substantially adversely affected by the activity, the department, in consultation with the entity, and within 45 days of receipt of the report, shall impose one or more new measures to protect the fish and wildlife resources affected by the activity. If requested to do so by the entity, the department shall make available the information upon which it determined the agreement no longer protects the affected fish and wildlife resources. If the entity disagrees with one or more of the new measures, within seven days of receiving the new measures, it shall notify the
 department, in writing, of the disagreement. The entity and the department shall consult regarding the disagreement. The consultation shall be completed within seven days after the department receives the entity’s notice of disagreement. If the department and entity fail to reach agreement, the entity may request, in writing, the appointment of a panel of arbitrators to resolve the disagreement. The panel of arbitrators shall be appointed within 14 days of the completed consultation. The panel of arbitrators shall issue a decision within 14 days of the date it is established. All other provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 1603 regarding the panel shall apply to any arbitration panel established in accordance with this subdivision. If the entity fails to provide timely status reports as required by this subdivision, the department may suspend or revoke the agreement.

(4) The agreement shall authorize department employees to conduct onsite
 inspections relevant to the agreement, upon reasonable notice. Nothing in this section limits the authority of department employees to inspect private or public sites.

(5) Except as provided in paragraph (3), subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1602 and the time periods to process agreements specified in this chapter do not apply to agreements issued pursuant to this section.

(h) Each region of the department shall log the notifications of activities for which a long-term agreement is being considered pursuant to subdivision (g). The log shall list the date the notification was received by the department, a brief description of the proposed activity, and the location of the activity. Each item shall remain on the log for one year. Upon written request by any person, a regional office shall send the log to that person monthly for one year. A request made
 pursuant to this subdivision may be renewed annually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 20.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1606.

The department shall not condition the issuance of an agreement on the receipt of another local, state, or federal permit.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 736, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1607.

Any time period prescribed in this chapter may be extended by mutual agreement.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 736, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1608.

The department shall provide any entity that submits a notification pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1602 with all of the following information:

(a) The time period for review of the notification.

(b) An explanation of the entity’s right to object to any measures proposed by the department.

(c) The time period within which objections may be made in writing to the department.

(d) The time period within which the department is required to respond, in writing, to the entity’s objections.

(e) An explanation of the right of the entity to arbitrate any measures in a draft agreement.

(f) The procedures and statutory timelines for arbitration, including, but not limited to, information about the payment requirements for arbitrator fees.

(g) The current schedule of fees to obtain an agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 21.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1609.

(a) The department may establish a graduated schedule of fees to be charged to any entity subject to this chapter. The fees charged shall be established in an amount necessary to pay the total costs incurred by the department in administering and enforcing this chapter, including, but not limited to, preparing and submitting agreements and conducting inspections. The department shall annually adjust the fees pursuant to Section 713. Fees received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(b) (1) The fee schedule established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not include a fee that exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000) for
 any single project.

(2) The fee limitation described in paragraph (1) does not apply to any project included in any agreement issued pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 1605.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   (SB 839)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1610.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), this chapter does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Immediate emergency work necessary to protect life or property.

(2) Immediate emergency repairs to public service facilities necessary to maintain service as a result of a disaster in an area in which a state of emergency has been proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(3) Emergency projects undertaken, carried out, or approved by a state or local governmental agency to maintain, repair, or restore an existing highway, as defined in Section 360 of the
 Vehicle Code, within the existing right-of-way of the highway, that has been damaged as a result of fire, flood, storm, earthquake, land subsidence, gradual earth movement, or landslide, within one year of the damage. Work needed in the vicinity above and below a highway may be conducted outside of the existing right-of-way if it is needed to stop ongoing or recurring mudslides, landslides, or erosion that pose an immediate threat to the highway, or to restore those roadways damaged by mudslides, landslides, or erosion to their predamage condition and functionality. This paragraph does not exempt from this chapter any project undertaken, carried out, or approved by a state or local governmental agency to expand or widen a highway damaged by fire, flood, storm, earthquake, land subsidence, gradual earth movement, or landslide. The exception provided in this paragraph does not apply to a highway designated as an official state scenic highway pursuant to Section 262 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(b) The entity performing the emergency work described in subdivision (a) shall notify the department of the work, in writing, within 14 days of beginning the work. Any work described in the emergency notification that does not meet the criteria for the emergency work described in subdivision (a) is a violation of this chapter if the entity did not first notify the department in accordance with Section 1602 or 1611.

(c) This chapter does not apply to activities undertaken pursuant to Section 1242.1 of the Water Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 4.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1611.

(a) An entity that submits a timber harvesting plan in accordance with Section 4581 of the Public Resources Code or directly to the department is deemed to have given the notification required by Section 1602, as long as the following information is included in the plan:

(1) The volume, type, and equipment to be used in removing or displacing any one or combination of soil, sand, gravel, or boulders.

(2) The volume of water, intended use, and equipment to be used in any water diversion or impoundment, if applicable.

(3) The equipment to be used in road or bridge construction.

(4) The type and density of vegetation to be affected and an estimate of the area involved.

(5) A diagram or sketch of the location of the operation that clearly indicates the stream or other water and access from a named public road. Locked gates shall be indicated and the compass direction shall be shown.

(6) A description of the period of time in which operations will be carried out.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department is not required to determine whether the notification is complete or otherwise process the notification until the timber harvesting plan and the proper notification fee have both been received by the department.

(c) Nothing in this section requires the department to issue an agreement fewer than 60 days from the date the notification is complete.

(d) The date on which the term of an agreement issued pursuant to this section begins shall be the date timber operations first commence, unless the agreement specifies a later beginning date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 736, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1612.

The department may suspend or revoke an agreement at any time if it determines that an entity is not in compliance with the terms of the agreement or fails to provide timely status reports as required by subdivision (g) of Section 1605. The department shall adopt regulations establishing the procedure for suspension or revocation of an agreement. The procedure shall require the department to provide to the entity a written notice that explains the basis for a suspension or revocation, and to provide the entity with an opportunity to correct any deficiency before the department suspends or revokes the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 736, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1613.

If, after receiving a notification, but before the department executes a final agreement, the department informs the entity, in writing, that the activity described in the notification, or any activity or conduct by the entity directly related thereto, violates any provision of this code or the regulations that implement the code, the department may suspend processing the notification, and subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1602 and the timelines specified in Section 1603 do not apply. This section ceases to apply if any of the following occurs:

(a) The department determines that the violation has been remedied.

(b) Legal action to prosecute the violation is not filed within the applicable statute of limitations.

(c) Legal action to prosecute the violation has been terminated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 340, Sec. 4.   (SB 839)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1614.

If the entity is required to perform work subject to this chapter pursuant to a court or administrative order or notice, the entity shall include the measures proposed by the department to protect fish and wildlife resources in the agreement. Those measures are not subject to arbitration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 736, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1615.

(a) An entity that violates this chapter is subject to a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation.

(b) The civil penalty imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) is separate from, and in addition to, any other civil penalty imposed pursuant to this section or any other provision of the law.

(c) In determining the amount of any civil penalty imposed pursuant to this section, the court shall take into consideration all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the nature, circumstance, extent, and gravity of the violation. In making this determination, the court may
 consider the degree of toxicity and volume of the discharge, the extent of harm caused by the violation, whether the effects of the violation may be reversed or mitigated, and, with respect to the defendant, the ability to pay, the effect of any civil penalty on the ability to continue in business, any voluntary cleanup efforts undertaken, any prior history of violations, the gravity of the behavior, the economic benefit, if any, resulting from the violation, and any other matters the court determines that justice may require.

(d) Every civil action brought under this section shall be brought by the Attorney General upon complaint by the department, or by the district attorney or city attorney in the name of the people of the State of California, and any actions relating to the same violation may be joined or consolidated.

(e) (1) In any civil action brought
 pursuant to this chapter in which a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction is sought, it is not necessary to allege or prove at any stage of the proceeding any of the following:

(A) That irreparable damage will occur if the temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction is not issued.

(B) That the remedy at law is inadequate.

(2) The court shall issue a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction in a civil action brought pursuant to this chapter without the allegations and without the proof specified in paragraph (1).

(f) All civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall not be considered fines or forfeitures as defined in Section 13003, and
 shall be apportioned in the following manner:

(1) Fifty percent shall be distributed to the county treasurer of the county in which the action is prosecuted. Amounts paid to the county treasurer shall be deposited in the county fish and wildlife propagation fund established pursuant to Section 13100.

(2) Fifty percent shall be distributed to the department for deposit in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund. These funds may be expended to cover the costs of any legal actions or for any other law enforcement purpose consistent with Section 9 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 340, Sec. 5.   (SB 839)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1616.

Any agreement or any memorandum of understanding executed by the department pursuant to this chapter prior to January 1, 2004, shall be subject to, and shall be governed by, the provisions of this chapter that were in existence prior to that date. This section does not apply to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1602, requiring an entity to provide a copy or other satisfactory evidence of an agreement attained prior to January 1, 1977, upon the request of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 736, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1617.

(a) The department may adopt general agreements for the cultivation of cannabis.

(b) Any general agreement adopted by the department subsequent to adoption of regulations under this section shall be in lieu of an individual agreement described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1602.

(c) Subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1602 and all other time periods to process agreements specified in this chapter do not apply to the issuance of a general agreement adopted by the department pursuant to this section.

(d) Any general agreement issued by the department pursuant to this section is
 a final agreement and is not subject to Section 1603 or 1604.

(e) The department shall charge a fee for a general agreement adopted by the department under this section in accordance with Section 1609.

(f) If the department adopts or amends a general agreement under this section, it shall do so as an emergency regulation. An emergency regulation adopted pursuant to this section, and any amendments to it, shall be adopted by the department in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The adoption of these regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government
 Code, an emergency regulation adopted by the department, or any amendments to it made by the department pursuant to this section, shall stay in effect until revised by the department.

(g) Regulations adopted pursuant to this section, and any amendment thereto, shall not be subject to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 109.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.5. Habitat Restoration and Enhancement Act [1650. - 1657.]

1650.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Habitat Restoration and Enhancement Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 604, Sec. 2.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 1657.)
-------------------------------------------

1651.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Fish passage guidelines” means those guidelines specified in the department’s California Salmonid Stream Habitat Restoration Manual and the National Marine Fisheries Service, Southwest Region, Guidelines for Salmonid Passage at Stream Crossings, and subsequent amendments or updates to either document.

(b) “Habitat restoration or enhancement project” means a project with the primary purpose of improving fish and wildlife habitat. A habitat restoration or enhancement project shall meet the eligibility requirements for the State Water Resources Control Board’s Order for Clean Water Act Section 401 General Water Quality Certification
 for Small Habitat Restoration Projects, or its current equivalent at the time the project proponent submits a written request pursuant to Section 1652 or 1653. The order or current equivalent may include programmatic waivers or waste discharge requirements for small habitat restoration projects.

(c) “Project proponent” means a person, public agency, or nonprofit organization seeking to implement a habitat restoration or enhancement project.

(d) “Species recovery plan” means a guidance document prepared by a government agency that identifies recovery actions, based upon the best scientific and commercial data available, necessary for the protection and recovery of listed species.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 604, Sec. 2.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 1657.)
-------------------------------------------

1652.

(a) A project proponent may submit a written request to approve a habitat restoration or enhancement project to the director pursuant to this section if the project has not received certification pursuant to the State Water Resources Control Board’s Order for Clean Water Act Section 401 General Water Quality Certification for Small Habitat Restoration Projects, or its current equivalent at the time the project proponent submits the written request. If the project has received certification pursuant to that order, or its current equivalent, the project proponent may submit a request for approval of the project pursuant to Section 1653.

(b) A written request to approve a habitat restoration or enhancement project pursuant to
 this section shall contain all of the following:

(1) The name, address, title, organization, telephone number, and email address of the natural person or persons who will be the main point of contact for the project proponent.

(2) A full description of the habitat restoration or enhancement project that includes the designs and techniques to be used for the project, restoration or enhancement methods, an estimate of temporary restoration- or enhancement-related disturbance, project schedule, anticipated activities, and how the project is expected to result in a net benefit to any affected habitat and species, consistent with paragraph (4) of subdivision (c).

(3) An assessment of the project area that provides a description of the existing flora and fauna and the potential presence of sensitive species or habitat. The
 assessment shall include preproject photographs of the project area that include a descriptive title, date taken, the photographic monitoring point, and photographic orientation.

(4) A geographic description of the project site including maps, land ownership information, and other relevant location information.

(5) A description of the environmental protection measures incorporated into the project design, so that no potentially significant adverse effects on the environment, as defined in Section 15382 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, are likely to occur with application of the specified environmental protection measures. Environmental protection measures may include, but are not limited to, appropriate seasonal work limitations, measures to avoid and minimize impacts to water quality and potentially present species protected by state and federal law, and the
 use of qualified professionals for standard preconstruction surveys where protected species are potentially present.

(6) Substantial evidence to support a conclusion that the project meets the requirements set forth in this section. Substantial evidence shall include references to relevant design criteria and environmental protection measures found in the documents specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (c).

(7) A certifying statement that the project will comply with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code), which may include, but not be limited to, the requirements of Section 15333 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, within 60 days after receiving a written request to approve a habitat
 restoration or enhancement project, the director shall approve a habitat restoration or enhancement project if the director determines that the written request includes all of the required information set forth in subdivision (b), and the project meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The project purpose is voluntary habitat restoration and the project is not required as mitigation.

(2) The project is not part of a regulatory permit for a nonhabitat restoration or enhancement construction activity, a regulatory settlement, a regulatory enforcement action, or a court order.

(3) The project meets the eligibility requirements of the State Water Resources Control Board’s Order for Clean Water Act Section 401 General Water Quality Certification for Small Habitat Restoration Projects, or its current equivalent at the
 time the project proponent submits the written request, but has not received certification pursuant to that order or its equivalent.

(4) The project is consistent with, or identified in, sources that describe best available restoration and enhancement methodologies, including one or more of the following:

(A) Federal- and state-listed species recovery plans or published protection measures, or previously approved department agreements and permits issued for voluntary habitat restoration or enhancement projects.

(B) Department and National Marine Fisheries Service fish screening criteria or fish passage guidelines.

(C) The department’s California Salmonid Stream Habitat Restoration Manual.

(D) Guidance documents and practice manuals that describe best available habitat restoration or enhancement methodologies that are utilized or approved by the department.

(5) The project will not result in cumulative adverse environmental impacts that are significant when viewed in connection with the effects of past, current, or probable future projects.

(d) If the director determines that the written request does not contain all of the information required by subdivision (b), or fails to meet the requirements set forth in subdivision (c), or both, the director shall deny the written request and inform the project proponent of the reason or reasons for the denial.

(e) The project proponent shall submit a notice of completion to the department no later than 30 days after the project approved pursuant to
 this section is completed. The notice of completion shall demonstrate that the project has been carried out in accordance with the project’s description. The notice of completion shall include a map of the project location, including the final boundaries of the restoration area or areas and postproject photographs. Each photograph shall include a descriptive title, date taken, photographic monitoring point, and photographic orientation.

(f) The project proponent shall submit a monitoring report describing whether the restoration project is meeting each of the restoration goals stated in the project application. Each report shall include photographs with a descriptive title, date taken, photographic monitoring point, and photographic orientation. The monitoring reports for Section 401 Water Quality Certification or waste discharge requirements of the State Water Resources Control Board or a regional water quality control board, or for department
 or federal voluntary habitat restoration programs, including, but not limited to, the Fisheries Restoration Grant Program, may be submitted in lieu of this requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 165.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 1657.)
-------------------------------------------

1653.

(a) A project proponent may submit a written request to approve a habitat restoration or enhancement project to the director pursuant to this section if the project has received certification pursuant to the State Water Resources Control Board’s Order for Clean Water Act Section 401 General Water Quality Certification for Small Habitat Restoration Projects, or its current equivalent at the time the project proponent submits the written request.

(b) A written request to approve a habitat restoration or enhancement project pursuant to this section shall include all of the following:

(1) Notice that the project proponent has received a notice of applicability that
 indicates that the project is authorized pursuant to the State Water Resources Control Board’s Order for Clean Water Act Section 401 General Water Quality Certification for Small Habitat Restoration Projects, or its equivalent at the time the project proponent submits the written request.

(2) A copy of the notice of applicability.

(3) A copy of the notice of intent provided to the State Water Resources Control Board or a regional water quality control board.

(4) A description of species protection measures incorporated into the project design, but not already included in the notice of intent, to avoid and minimize impacts to potentially present species protected by state and federal law, such as appropriate seasonal work limitations and the use of qualified professionals for standard preconstruction surveys where
 protected species are potentially present.

(5) The fees required pursuant to Section 1655.

(c) Upon receipt of the notice specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the director shall immediately have published in the General Public Interest section of the California Regulatory Notice Register the receipt of that notice.

(d) Within 30 days after the director has received the notice of applicability described in subdivision (b), the director shall determine whether the written request accompanying the notice of applicability is complete.
